it: Tipo di fianco dello pneumatico: Fianco nero; Lettere bianche contornate (OWL); Lettere bianche in rilievo (RWL); Linea rossa; Fascia bianca; Altro
zh-TW: 輪胎胎側類型: 黑邊胎; 白字輪廓胎 (OWL); 凸白字胎 (RWL); 紅線胎; 白邊胎; 其他
da: Type af dæksidevæg: Blackwall; Omridsede hvide bogstaver (OWL); Forhøjede hvide bogstaver (RWL); Redline; Whitewall; Andet
lt-LT: Padangos šoninės sienelės tipas: Juoda šoninė sienelė; Balti raidžių kontūrai (OWL); Iškilios baltos raidės (RWL); Raudona linija; Balta šoninė sienelė; Kita
cs: Typ bočnice pneumatiky: Černá bočnice; Bílý obrys písmen (OWL); Vystouplá bílá písmena (RWL); Červený pruh; Bílá bočnice; Jiné
ja: タイヤサイドウォールタイプ: ブラックウォール; アウトラインホワイトレター (OWL); レイズドホワイトレター (RWL); レッドライン; ホワイトウォール; その他
ro-RO: Tip de flanc al anvelopei: Perete lateral negru; Litere albe conturate (OWL); Litere albe în relief (RWL); Linie roșie; Perete lateral alb; Altele
de: Reifenseitenwandtyp: Schwarze Seitenwand; Weiße Umrissschrift (OWL); Erhabene weiße Schrift (RWL); Roter Streifen; Weißwand; Sonstige
vi: Loại thành lốp: Thành lốp đen; Chữ viền trắng (OWL); Chữ trắng nổi (RWL); Viền đỏ; Thành lốp trắng; Khác
pt-BR: Pneu tipo de lateral: Lateral preta; Letras brancas vazadas (OWL); Letras brancas em relevo (RWL); Faixa vermelha; Faixa branca; Outros
el: Τύπος πλευρικού τοιχώματος ελαστικού: Μαύρο πλαϊνό (blackwall); Λευκό περίγραμμα γραμμάτων (OWL); Ανάγλυφα λευκά γράμματα (RWL); Κόκκινη ρίγα (redline); Λευκό πλαϊνό (whitewall); Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de flanco do pneu: Parede preta; Letras brancas delineadas (OWL); Letras brancas em relevo (RWL); Linha vermelha; Parede branca; Outro
tr: Lastik yanak tipi: Siyah yanak; Beyaz dış hatlı harfler (OWL); Kabartmalı beyaz harfler (RWL); Kırmızı şerit; Beyaz yanak; Diğer
sv: Däcksidatyp: Svarta däcksidor; Vita konturbokstäver (OWL); Upphöjda vita bokstäver (RWL); Röd linje; Vita däcksidor; Övrigt
th: ประเภทของแก้มยาง: แก้มยางสีดำ; ตัวอักษรสีขาวแบบมีขอบ (OWL); ตัวอักษรสีขาวแบบนูน (RWL); ขอบแดง; แก้มยางสีขาว; อื่นๆ
ko: 타이어 측면 유형: 블랙월; 아웃라인 화이트 레터(OWL); 레이즈드 화이트 레터(RWL); 레드라인; 화이트월; 기타
en: Tire sidewall type: Blackwall; Outline white letters (OWL); Raised white letters (RWL); Redline; Whitewall; Other
nl: Bandzijwandtype: Zwarte zijwand; Witte omlijnde letters (OWL); Witte opstaande letters (RWL); Rode lijn; Witte zijwand; Overige
hr-HR: Vrsta bočne stijenke gume: Crna bočnica; Bijeli obrub slova (OWL); Ispupčena bijela slova (RWL); Crvena linija; Bijela bočnica; Ostalo
zh-CN: 轮胎侧壁类型: 黑胎侧; 空心白字（OWL）; 凸起白字（RWL）; 红线; 白胎侧; 其他
ru: Тип боковины шины: Чёрная боковина; Белые контурные буквы (OWL); Выпуклые белые буквы (RWL); Красная полоса; Белая боковина; Другое
pl: Typ ściany bocznej opony: Czarna; Białe obrysy liter (OWL); Białe wypukłe litery (RWL); Redline (z czerwonym paskiem); Whitewall (z białym pasem); Inny
fr: Type de flanc du pneu: Flanc noir; Lettres blanches contournées (OWL); Lettres blanches en relief (RWL); Ligne rouge; Flanc blanc; Autre
fi: Renkaan sivupinnan tyyppi: Musta kylki; Valkoiset ääriviivakirjaimet (OWL); Kohokuvioidut valkoiset kirjaimet (RWL); Punainen raita; Valkosivu; Muu
hu: Gumiabroncs oldalfalának típusa: Fekete oldalfal; Körvonalas fehér betűk (OWL); Kiemelkedő fehér betűk (RWL); Piros csíkos; Fehér oldalfal; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta bočnice pnevmatike: Črna bočnica; Belo obrobljene črke (OWL); Izbočene bele črke (RWL); Rdeča črta; Bela bočnica; Drugo
nb: Dekksideveggtype: Svart sidevegg; Hvite omrissbokstaver (OWL); Opphøyde hvite bokstaver (RWL); Rød stripe; Hvit sidevegg; Annet
es: Tipo de flanco del neumático: Pared negra; Letras blancas delineadas (OWL); Letras blancas en relieve (RWL); Línea roja; Pared blanca; Otro
sk-SK: Typ bočnice pneumatiky: Čierna bočnica; Biele obrysy písmen (OWL); Vystúpené biele písmená (RWL); Červený prúžok; Biela bočnica; Iné
bg-BG: Тип странична стена на гумата: Черна страница; Бял контур на буквите (OWL); Релефни бели букви (RWL); Червена линия; Бяла страница; Друго